Massachusetts, session 194th, S1418.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary the
commissioner of the department of developmental services shall include fetal opioid drug
exposure and addiction under the definition of Closely Related Developmental Conditions as
defined under 115 CMR 2 and 115 CMR 6.06(1).
SECTION 2. The commissioner of the department of developmental services shall at
their discretion include additional diagnosis as part of the definition of closely related
developmental condition.
of 1